Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4553.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1177. (1) A child enrolling in a public or nonpublic school for the first time or , beginning in the 2014-2015 school year, enrolling in grade 7 for the first time shall submit 1 of the following: (a) A statement signed by a physician that the child has been tested for and immunized or protected against diseases specified by the director of the department of community health and human services. (b) A statement signed by a parent or guardian to the effect that the child has not been immunized because of religious convictions or other objection to immunization, as described in section 9215 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.9215. (c) A statement signed by a physician that certifies that the child is in the process of complying with all immunization requirements. (2) In addition, the parent or guardian of each child enrolling in kindergarten for the first time shall submit a statement signed by a district, county, or city health department director stating that the child has been administered the department of community health and human services preschool vision screening test, or signed by a licensed medical or osteopathic physician or a licensed optometrist stating that the child's eyes have been examined during the preschool years after age 3 and before initial entrance. A vision test is not required if there is a statement signed by a parent or guardian to the effect that the child cannot be submitted to the test because of religious convictions. (3) Not later than November 1 of each year, the administrator of each school shall provide the director of the department of community health and human services with the immunization status of each pupil in grades K through to 12 who enrolled in the school for the first time, or , beginning in the 2014-2015 school year, enrolled in grade 7 in the school for the first time, between the immediately preceding January 1 and the immediately preceding September 30, as well as a vision report of each child entering kindergarten during that time period. This information shall must be transmitted through the approved local full-time health department, if available, and shall be on forms provided by the director of community health and human services or otherwise reported in a manner approved by the director of the department of community health and human services. Not later than February 1 of each year, the administrator of each school shall provide an update to the report due the previous November 1 to show the immunization status of each pupil in grades K through to 12 who enrolled in the school for the first time, or , beginning in the 2014-2015 school year, enrolled in grade 7 in the school for the first time, during the calendar year ending the immediately preceding December 31. This information shall must be transmitted in the same manner as the report due the previous November 1. (4) The Except as otherwise provided in section 9215 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.9215, the department of community health and human services shall promulgate rules, including rules identifying the diseases specified under subsection (1)(a), for the implementation of to implement this section. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S03040'25) or House Bill No. 4552 (request no. H03040'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.